Utah statutes.
77-10a-16.   Return of indictment -- Warrant of arrest -- Bail.

(1)  The managing judge may upon return of an indictment, when the defendant is not in custody, cause a warrant to be issued for the arrest of the defendant charged and shall fix an appropriate bail.

(2)  Return of any warrant of arrest shall be in the court to which the indictment is transferred for trial.  The court to which the return is made may review bail and any conditions of detention or release.

